California, session 20252026, SB902.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8234 of the Education Code is amended to read:8234. Contractors operating or providing services pursuant to this chapter may do both of the following:(a) (1) Maintain records electronically, in compliance with state and federal standards, as determined by the department. A conversion from a paper record to an electronic format, as well as the storage of the electronic record, shall comply with the minimum standards described in Section 12168.7 of the Government Code and the standards for trustworthy electronic document or record preservation described in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 22620.1) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) Pursuant to Section 33421, the records shall be retained by each contractor for at least five years, or, where an audit has been requested by a state agency, until the date the audit is resolved, whichever is longer.(3) This subdivision does not require a contractor to create records electronically.(b) (1) Use a digital an electronic signature that complies with state and federal standards, as determined by the department, that may be a marking that is either computer generated or produced by electronic means and is intended by the signatory to have the same effect as a handwritten signature.(2) The use of a digital an electronic signature shall have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature if the requirements for the digital electronic signatures and their acceptable technology, as provided in Section 16.5 of the Government Code and in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), are satisfied.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 10209.7 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:10209.7. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a signature required by this part may be satisfied by use of an electronic signature, as defined by Section 1633.2 of the Civil Code, if the signature meets the requirements of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) (UETA).(b) Notwithstanding any other law, documents required by this part that contain an electronic signature may be created and stored in an electronic format in compliance with the UETA.(c) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section, including standards for authentication, consent, and record retention.SEC. 3. Section 10269 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:10269. Contractors operating or providing services pursuant to this chapter may do both of the following:(a) (1) Maintain records electronically, in compliance with state and federal standards, as determined by the department. A conversion from a paper record to an electronic format, as well as the storage of the electronic record, shall comply with the minimum standards described in Section 12168.7 of the Government Code and the standards for trustworthy electronic document or record preservation described in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 22620.1) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) The records shall be retained by each contractor for at least five years, or, where an audit has been requested by a state agency, until the date the audit is resolved, whichever is longer.(3) This subdivision does not require a contractor to create records electronically.(b) (1) Use a digital an electronic signature that complies with state and federal standards, as determined by the department, that may be a marking that is either computer generated or produced by electronic means and is intended by the signatory to have the same effect as a handwritten signature.(2) The use of a digital an electronic signature shall have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature if the requirements for the digital electronic signatures and their acceptable technology, as provided in Section 16.5 of the Government Code and in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), are satisfied.